Idaho, session 2025, H0147.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1103, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1103. DEFINITIONS -- BONDS -- LIMITATION ON AMOUNT -- ELECTIONS TO
AUTHORIZE ISSUANCE. (1) For the purposes of this chapter the following def-
initions shall have the meanings specified: "Market value for assessment
purposes" means the amount of the last preceding equalized assessment of all
taxable property and all property exempt from taxation pursuant to section
63-602G, Idaho Code, within the school district on the tax rolls completed
and available as of the date of approval by the electorate in the school bond
election. "Aggregate outstanding indebtedness" means the total sum of unre-
deemed outstanding bonds, minus all moneys in the bond interest and redemp-
tion fund or funds accumulated for the redemption of such outstanding bonds,
and minus the sum of all taxes levied for the redemption of such bonds, with
the exception of that portion of such tax levies required for the payment of
interest on bonds, which taxes remain uncollected. "Issue," "issued," or
"issuance" means a formal delivery of bonds to any purchaser thereof and pay-
ment therefor to the school district.
(2) The board of trustees of any school district, upon approval of a ma-
jority thereof, may submit to the qualified school district electors of the
district the question as to whether the board shall be empowered to issue ne-
gotiable coupon bonds of the district in an amount and for a period of time to
be named in the notice of election.
(3) An elementary school district which employs not less than six (6)
teachers, or a school district operating an elementary school or schools,
and a secondary school or schools, or issuing bonds for the acquisition of a
secondary school or schools, may issue bonds in an amount not to exceed five
percent (5%) eight percent (8%) of the market value for assessment purposes
thereof, less the aggregate outstanding indebtedness; and no other school
district shall issue bonds in an amount to exceed at any time two percent (2%)
of the market value for assessment purposes thereof less the aggregate out-
standing indebtedness. The market value for assessment purposes, the aggre-
gate outstanding indebtedness and the unexhausted debt-incurring power of
the district shall each be determined as of the date of approval by the elec-
tors in the school bond election.
(4) Notice of the bond election shall be given, the election shall be
conducted and the returns thereof canvassed, and the qualifications of elec-
tors voting or offering to vote shall be, as provided in title 34, Idaho Code.


(5) The question shall be approved only if the percentage of votes cast
at such election were cast in favor thereof is that which now, or may here-
after be, set by the constitution of the state of Idaho. Upon such approval
of the issuance of bonds, the same may be issued at any time after the date of
such election.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2025.